Maryland, session 2025, HB1464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
13–424.
(A) THE OWNER OF A FLEET OF FIVE OR MORE RENTAL VEHICLES MAY
REGISTER ANY RENTAL VEHICLE IN THE FLEET:
(1) UNDER THIS SECTION; OR
(2) UNDER § 13–939.1 OF THIS TITLE.
(B) THE ADMINISTRATION:
(1) SHALL ISSUE DISTINCTIVE “FLEET VEHICLE” REGISTRATION
PLATES FOR ANY RENTAL VEHICLE REGISTERED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(2) MAY NOT REQUIRE THE ATTACHMENT, DISPLAY, OR ISSUANCE OF
A VALIDATION TAB FOR A RENTAL VEHICLE REGISTERED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(C) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, REGISTRATION UNDER THIS SECTION
FOR EACH RENTAL VEHICLE THAT IS PART OF THE SAME FLEET SHALL EXPIRE ON
THE SAME DATE.
– 1 –

Ch. 526 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(D) (1) THE REGISTRATION FEE FOR A RENTAL VEHICLE REGISTERED
UNDER THIS SECTION IS AS DETERMINED UNDER § 13–939.1 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE ANNUAL REGISTRATION FEE, AN OWNER OF
A RENTAL VEHICLE REGISTERED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL PAY A ONE–TIME
INITIAL REGISTRATION FEE NOT EXCEEDING $8.50 WHEN THE NEW REGISTRATION
PLATES ARE ISSUED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –